spell/personal.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY esianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZ'

PFX M Y 10
PFX M 0 0/MMM .
PFX M 0 1/MMM .
PFX M 0 2/MMM .
PFX M 0 3/MMM .
PFX M 0 4/MMM .
PFX M 0 5/MMM .
PFX M 0 6/MMM .
PFX M 0 7/MMM .
PFX M 0 8/MMM .
PFX M 0 9/MMM .

SFX N Y 10
SFX N 0 0/NNN .
SFX N 0 1/NNN .
SFX N 0 2/NNN .
SFX N 0 3/NNN .
SFX N 0 4/NNN .
SFX N 0 5/NNN .
SFX N 0 6/NNN .
SFX N 0 7/NNN .
SFX N 0 8/NNN .
SFX N 0 9/NNN .
